Utah statutes.
13-47-204.   Department to publish list of registered private employers.

On and after July 1, 2010, the department shall publish electronically a list of private employers who register under Section 13-47-203 on a website accessible to the general public without a charge.



Enacted by Chapter 403, 2010 General Session

